Utah statutes.
53A-20b-202.   Charter School Reserve Account contribution requirements for qualifying charter schools.

(1)  When bonds are issued under the credit enhancement program for a qualifying charter school, the qualifying charter school shall contribute money to the reserve account in the amount determined as provided in Subsection (2).

(2)  The authority shall determine the up-front and ongoing requirements for contributions of money to the reserve account for each qualifying charter school.

